Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Nonresident Violators’ Compact

186.860.
Authorization to develop and join the Nonresident Violator Compact.

The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, the commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation, or a duly authorized agent, is hereby authorized and directed to negotiate with other states for the purpose of developing and joining the “Nonresident Violator Compact.” The department may promulgate regulations concerning the administration of such compact and shall prescribe the penalties and procedures for the required compliance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 287, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

186.865.
Motorcycle registration requirements — Health insurance requirements. [Repealed.]

186.870.
Motorcycle safety education program — Standards — Administrative regulations. [Repealed.]

186.875.
Motorcycle rider training courses — Exemption from motorcycle driver’s license skill test. [Repealed.]

186.880.
Instructors — Requirements for approval. [Repealed.]

186.885.
Powers of cabinet. [Repealed.]

186.890.
Motorcycle safety education program fund. [Repealed.]

186.891.
Revenues relating to motorcycle safety education program fund — Report. [Repealed.]

186.892.
Motorcycle Safety Education Advisory Commission — Purpose. [Repealed.]

186.893.
Membership — Officers — Meetings. [Repealed.]

186.894.
Responsibilities of commission. [Repealed.]

186.895.
Annual report to Governor and General Assembly. [Repealed.]